Arkansas, session 2025, SB587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 10 is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 26 — Parents' Peace of Mind Act

20-10-2601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Parents' Peace
of Mind Act".

20-10-2602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Authorized electronic monitoring" means the placement of
*JMB021*
03/31/2025 1:06:58 PM JMB021

SB587
electronic monitoring devices in the common areas or room of a resident of a
facility and the recordings from such devices under this subchapter;
(2) "Authorized electronic monitoring devices" means:
(A) Video surveillance cameras installed in the common
areas or room of a resident of a facility under this subchapter; or
(B) Audio devices installed in the room of a resident
under this subchapter that are designed to acquire or record communications
or other sounds occurring in the room;
(3) “Facility” means a long-term care facility that is required
to be licensed under § 20-10-224;
(4) "Representative" means the representative of a resident or
guardian of a resident appointed by a court; and
(5) "Resident” means a person who is a resident of a facility.

20-10-2603. Required notice.
(a) A facility shall provide written notice to each resident or to his
or her representative that authorized electronic monitoring of a resident’s
room conducted under this subchapter is not compulsory and shall only be
conducted with the written consent of the resident or his or her
representative.
(b) A facility shall not refuse to admit an individual to the facility
and shall not remove a resident from a facility because the individual,
resident, or his or her representative does not authorize electronic
monitoring of the resident’s room.
(c) A facility shall post at or near its main entrances a sign that
clearly states that authorized electronic monitoring devices may be in use in
the facility.

20-10-2604. Prohibition on tampering or destruction.
(a) A person or entity shall not purposefully obstruct, tamper with,
or destroy an authorized electronic monitoring device installed in a
facility.
(b) A person or entity that purposefully obstructs, tampers with, or
destroys a recording or an authorized electronic monitoring device installed
in a facility upon conviction is guilty of a Class D felony.
(c) A person or entity shall not intercept a communication or disclose
03/31/2025 1:06:58 PM JMB021

SB587
or use an intercepted communication of an authorized electronic monitoring
device placed or installed in a common area of a facility without the express
written consent of the facility, or, for an authorized electronic monitoring
device installed in a room of the resident, the express written consent of
the resident or his or her representative.

20-10-2605. Authorized electronic monitoring device in private room of
resident.
(a) A resident or his or her representative may install an authorized
electronic monitoring device under this subchapter in his or her private room
at the resident's or representative's own expense.
(b) Notice of the authorized electronic monitoring device shall be
posted at the entrance of the resident's room that the room is being
monitored by an authorized electronic monitoring device.

20-10-2606. Authorized electronic monitoring device in a shared room.
(a)(1) A resident of a shared room or his or her representative may
install an authorized electronic monitoring device under this subchapter in
the shared quarters only with the written consent of each roommate or his or
her representative.
(2) The written consent in subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall be on a form prescribed by the Office of Long-Term Care and shall be
placed on file with the administrator of the facility.
(3) The office may include other information as deemed
appropriate by the office on the form described in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section.
(b) If a resident residing in a shared room or his or her
representative does not consent to the use or installation of an authorized
electronic monitoring device, the facility shall accommodate the resident or
the representative by moving one or more of the residents to different rooms
within a reasonable amount of time following a request for a room change.
(c) Consent may be limited in the following manner:
(1) That a video surveillance camera be pointed away from the
consenting roommate or his or her portion of the shared room; and
(2) That use of audio or video recordings produced by the
authorized electronic monitoring device that depict the voice or likeness of
03/31/2025 1:06:58 PM JMB021

SB587
the consenting roommate shall not be shared without further consent of the
consenting roommate or his or her representative.
(d) Consent by a roommate or his or her representative under this
section may be revoked at any time.
(e) If authorized electronic monitoring is being conducted in the room
of a resident, another resident may not be moved into the room unless the
resident or his or her representative has consented to the use of existing
authorized electronic monitoring.
(f) Notice of the authorized electronic monitoring device shall be
posted at the entrance of the resident's room that the shared room is being
monitored by an authorized electronic monitoring device.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Authorized electronic monitoring device —
Compliance.
(a) The Office of Long-Term Care shall prepare and make available the
written consent forms required by this act sufficiently in advance of the
effective date to be accessible on the website of the office.
(b) A resident or his or her representative presently using an
electronic monitoring device before the effective date of this act shall
comply with all consent and disclosure requirements of this act by the
effective date of this act.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act is effective on and after November 1, 2025.












03/31/2025 1:06:58 PM JMB021